Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-1-146. Juvenile traffic offenders.

All cases of alleged traffic violations by children coming within this part shall be heard and disposed of upon a traffic ticket or citation signed by a law enforcement officer that describes in general terms the nature of the violation. Such cases may be disposed of through informal adjustment, pretrial diversion, or judicial diversion; in any case, however, the child or the child's parents may request and shall be granted a hearing before the judge.

If the court finds that the child violated a traffic law or ordinance, the court may adjudicate the child to be a traffic violator, and the court may make one (1) or any combination of the following decisions:

Suspend and hold the child's driver license for a specified or indefinite time;

Limit the child's driving privileges as an order of the court;

Order the child to attend traffic school, if available, or to receive driving instructions;

Impose a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) against the child's parent or legal guardian;

Perform community service work in lieu of a fine; or

Place the child on probation pursuant to § 37-1-131(a)(2).

In any case or class of cases, the judge of any juvenile court may waive jurisdiction of traffic violators who are sixteen (16) years of age or older, and such cases shall be heard by the court or courts having jurisdiction of adult traffic violations, or the child's parent or legal guardian may pay the stipulated fine to a traffic bureau.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 45; T.C.A., § 37-245; Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 11; 2018, ch. 1052, §§ 43, 44; 2019, ch. 312, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (b)(5).

The 2018 amendment, in (b)(4), inserted “against the child’s parent or legal guardian”; and, in (c), substituted “child’s parent or legal guardian” for “child” preceding “may pay”.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “through informal adjustment, pretrial diversion, or judicial diversion” for “nonjudicially under the supervision of the judge”; in (b), substituted “adjudicate” for “decree”, and substituted “the court” for “, in addition to any disposition provided for in this part for the disposition of a delinquent or unruly child, the judge”; and added (b)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 17. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 312, § 11. May 8, 2019.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 1 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

37-1-147. Termination of parental rights.

The juvenile court shall be authorized to terminate the rights of a parent or guardian to a child upon the grounds and pursuant to the procedures set forth in title 36, chapter 1, part 1.

Upon entering an order to terminate parental or guardian rights to a child, the court shall award guardianship or partial guardianship of the child as provided in the relevant provisions of title 36, chapter 1, part 1.

The effect of the court's order terminating parental or guardian rights shall be as provided in § 36-1-113.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 46; 1977, ch. 482, § 6; 1981, ch. 316, § 4; 1981, ch. 348, §§ 3, 4; 1983, ch. 435, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., § 37-246; Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 31; 1991, ch. 126, § 1; 1995, ch. 532, § 13.

Cross-References. Aggravated rape, §39-13-502.

Mandatory child abuse reports, title 37, ch. 1, part 4.

Termination of parental rights, §36-1-113.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 803 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 1 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.1.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77 (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451, 469, 493 (1978).

37-1-148. Illegal use of telecommunication device by minor.

A minor commits illegal use of a telecommunication device who:

Intentionally or knowingly, by use of a telecommunication device, transmits, distributes, publishes, or disseminates a photograph, video, or other material that contains a sexually explicit image of a minor; or

Intentionally possesses a photograph, video, or other material that contains a sexually explicit image of a minor.

A minor does not violate subdivision (a)(2) if:

The minor did not solicit the photograph, video, or other material; and

The minor:

Deleted the photograph, video, or other material; or

Reported the photograph, video, or other material to the minor's parent or legal guardian or to a school or law enforcement official.

Illegal use of a telecommunication device committed under subsection (a) is considered an unruly act, for which a court may make a disposition as authorized by § 37-1-132.

Acts 2017, ch. 367, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-1-148 (Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 47; T.C.A., § 37-247), concerning the effect of orders terminating parental rights, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 532, § 14, effective January 1, 1996.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 367, § 3. July 1, 2017.

37-1-149. Guardian ad litem — Special advocate — Appointment.

The court at any stage of a proceeding under this part, on application of a party or on its own motion, shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is a party to the proceeding if such child has no parent, guardian or custodian appearing on such child's behalf or such parent's, guardian's or custodian's interests conflict with the child's or in any other case in which the interests of the child require a guardian. The court, in any proceeding under this part resulting from a report of harm or an investigation report under §§ 37-1-401 — 37-1-411, shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child who was the subject of the report. A party to the proceeding or the party's employee or representative shall not be appointed.

Any guardian ad litem appointed by the court shall receive training appropriate to that role prior to such appointment. Such training shall include, but is not limited to, training in early childhood, child and adolescent development provided by a qualified professional.

The court may also appoint a nonlawyer special advocate trained in accordance with that role and in accordance with the standards of the Tennessee Court Appointed Special Advocates Association (CASA) to act in the best interest of a child before, during and after court proceedings.

The court-appointed special advocate shall conduct such investigation and make such reports and recommendations pertaining to the welfare of a child as the court may order or direct.

Any guardian ad litem or special advocate so appointed by the court shall be presumed to be acting in good faith and in so doing shall be immune from any liability that might otherwise be incurred while acting within the scope of such appointment.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 48; 1973, ch. 81, § 4; T.CA., § 37-248; Acts 1990, ch. 929, § 1; 2004, ch. 584, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 1016, § 2.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 40 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 37 and in the text of Rule 39 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VI. Juvenile Courts (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 469 (1978).

Juvenile court hearsay (Donald F. Paine), 36 No. 10 Tenn. B.J. 35 (2000).

Protecting Our Most Vulnerable Citizens: New Guidelines Clarify, Strengthen Mission for Guardians Ad Litem, 38 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 13 (2002).

Attorney General Opinions. Because a juvenile court has the authority to appoint counsel and to punish disobedience of its orders as contempt, an attorney who refuses a juvenile court order of appointment commits, and may be punished for, contempt, regardless whether she intends to practice in that court in the future, OAG 02-107 (10/01/02).

An attorney, including a Title 37 guardian ad litem, who files a criminal injuries compensation claim on behalf of a child at the request of the Department of Children's Services is eligible for attorney's fees, OAG 05-185 (12/28/05).

The Department of Children's Services (DCS) has the authority to request private attorneys, including a child's guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to T.C.A. §37-1-149, to represent DCS in filing a criminal injuries compensation claim for the child, OAG 05-185 (12/28/05).

It would be inappropriate to attach guardian ad litem fees to a person's child support obligation because such fees are not child support, OAG 07-154 (11/21/07).

37-1-150. Cost and expense for care of child.

The following expenses may be a charge upon the funds of the county upon certification thereof by the court:

The cost of medical and other examinations and treatment of a child that is ordered by the court. The cost of outpatient mental health evaluations under § 37-1-128(e)(1) shall be the responsibility of the state;

Reasonable compensation for services and related expenses of counsel appointed by the court for a party; provided, however, that in the case of indigent persons appointed counsel pursuant to § 37-1-126, the state, through the administrative office of the courts, shall pay such compensation. The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the nature of the expense for which compensation may be allowed hereunder, and such limitations and conditions for such compensation as it deems appropriate, subject to this subdivision (a)(2). Such rules shall specify the form and content of applications for compensation under this subdivision (a)(2). The court may adopt such other rules related to this subdivision (a)(2) as it deems appropriate in the public interest;

Reasonable compensation for a guardian ad litem, except that in the case of indigent persons, the state, through the administrative office of the courts, shall pay for the guardian ad litem required by § 37-1-149 for proceedings alleging a child to be dependent and neglected or abused. The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the nature of the expense for which compensation may be allowed hereunder, and such limitations and conditions for such compensation as it deems appropriate, subject to the provisions of this subdivision (a)(3). Such rules shall specify the form and content of applications for compensation under this subdivision (a)(3). The court may adopt such other rules related to this subdivision (a)(3) as it deems appropriate in the public interest;

The cost of any preadjudicatory placement of a child pursuant to §§ 37-1-114 and 37-1-116, including necessary transportation of the child to such placement. A child alleged to be in violation of the conditions of home placement or charged with the commission of an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult and eligible for secure detention as provided by § 37-1-114(c) who is taken into custody in a county that does not operate a secure juvenile detention facility may, with the approval of the court having jurisdiction in the matter, be transported to and from the nearest such facility in this state; the cost of such transportation and placement shall be paid by the state subject to appropriations to the commission on children and youth for juvenile court services. Payment may also be made from available federal funding;

The expense of service of summons, notices, subpoenas, travel expense of witnesses, except as provided in subsection (b), transportation of the child, and other like expenses incurred in the proceedings under this part; and

The reasonable cost of secretarial services for the court in performing its duties as a juvenile court.

The cost of transporting a child who has been committed to a state correctional institution on an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult shall be paid by the state. The cost of transportation of a child for mental health examination or evaluation when the examination or evaluation has been ordered by the juvenile court judge for a child charged with commission of an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult shall be paid by the county.

The cost of an inpatient mental health examination or evaluation ordered by the juvenile court judge for a child charged with commission of an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult, and the cost incidental to the examination or evaluation, shall be paid by the city or county.

The cost of transporting a child from another state for an offense that would be a felony if the child were an adult shall be paid by the state; otherwise, the city or county will bear the cost.

If, after due notice to the parents, legal custodians or guardians, and after affording them an opportunity to be heard, the court finds that they are financially able to pay all or part of the costs and expenses stated in subdivisions (a)(1)-(5), the court may order them to pay the same and prescribe the manner of payment. Unless otherwise ordered, payment shall be made to the clerk of the juvenile court for remittance to the person to whom compensation is due or, if the costs and expenses have been paid by the county, to the appropriate officer of the county.

If, after due notice to the parents, legal custodians or guardians, and after affording them an opportunity to be heard, the court finds that they are financially able to pay all or part of the costs and expenses of the mental evaluation or examination of the child, which have been paid by the city or county pursuant to subsection (b), the court may order them to pay the costs and prescribe the manner of payment. Unless otherwise ordered, payment shall be made to the clerk of the juvenile court for remittance to the person to whom compensation is due; or if the costs and expenses have been paid by the state, to the appropriate officer of the state.

Attorneys appointed hereunder, other than public defenders, are entitled to reasonable compensation for their services, both prior to and at the hearing of the cause, and are entitled to reimbursement for their reasonable and necessary expenses in accordance with the rules of the supreme court.

Each attorney seeking reimbursement or compensation hereunder shall file an application with the juvenile court, stating in detail the nature and amount of the expenses claimed, supporting such claim with receipts showing payment thereof and stating the nature and extent of the attorney's services, including those in connection with any preliminary hearing.

Costs for proceedings under this title or the costs of the care or treatment of any child that is ordered by the court shall be paid by the state only when specifically authorized by this title or other provisions of law.

In proceedings where the child is determined to be indigent pursuant to § 37-1-126 and the court appoints counsel or a guardian ad litem to represent the child, but finds the child's parents, legal custodians, or guardians are financially able to defray a portion or all of the cost of the child's representation, the court shall enter an order directing the child's parents, legal custodians, or guardians to pay into the registry of the clerk of the court any sum that the court determines the child's parents, legal custodians, or guardians are able to pay.

In proceedings where an adult is determined to be indigent pursuant to § 37-1-126 and the court appoints counsel to represent the adult and finds the adult financially able to defray a portion or all of the cost of the adult's representation, the court shall enter an order directing the adult to pay into the registry of the clerk of the court any sum that the court determines the adult is able to pay.

The sum to defray a portion or all of the costs shall be subject to execution as any other judgment. The court may provide for payments to be made at intervals, which the court shall establish, and upon terms and conditions as are fair and just. The court may also modify its order when there has been a change in circumstances.

The clerk of the court shall collect all moneys paid pursuant to this subsection (g). The clerk shall notify the court of any failure to comply with the court’s order. At the conclusion of the proceedings, the court shall order the clerk to pay to the administrative office of the courts any funds that the clerk collected. The clerk of the court shall receive a commission of five percent (5%) of the moneys collected for the clerk's services in collecting, handling and making payment pursuant to the order of the court.

If the administrative office of the courts receives funds greater than the total amount which appointed counsel or the guardian ad litem has claimed and has been reimbursed pursuant to Tennessee Supreme Court Rule 13, then any such excess funds shall be paid to the appointed attorney.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 49; 1971, ch. 107, § 1; 1972, ch. 755, § 1; 1973, ch. 258, § 1; 1974, ch. 483, § 1; 1977, ch. 482, §§ 7, 8; 1980, ch. 796, § 3; 1981, ch. 316, § 5; 1983, ch. 408, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., § 37-249; Acts 1984, ch. 977, § 1; 1985, ch. 59, § 1; 1986, ch. 878, § 5; 1991, ch. 491, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 49, 50; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 103; 1999, ch. 508, § 9; 2001, ch. 368, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 549, §§ 3-5; 2012, ch. 857, §§ 6-10; 2018, ch. 1052, § 45.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (g)(1), substituted “the child's parents, legal custodians, or guardians” for “the child, the child's parents, legal custodians or guardians” and similar language throughout, and substituted “are” for “is” preceding “able to pay.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Cross-References. Support of child over 18 in high school, §34-1-102.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 10 and in the text of Rules 30 and 37 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1977).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of juvenile court to assess fees for services provided to the juvenile, OAG 99-147 (7/30/99).

If a juvenile court orders the pre-adjudication detention of a child who has pending delinquency charges and who is currently in the custody of the department of children's services as a dependent and neglected child, the cost of pre-adjudicatory detention cannot be taxed to the department as a “parent or other person legally obligated to care for and support the child,” OAG 01-130 (8/20/01).

37-1-151. Parents' liability for support.

In any case in which the court shall find a child dependent and neglected, unruly or delinquent, it may in the same or subsequent proceeding, upon the parents of such child or either of them being duly summoned or voluntarily appearing, proceed to inquire into the ability of such parent to support the child or contribute to such child's support, and if the court shall find such parent or parents able to support the child or contribute thereto, the court may enter such order or decree as shall be according to equity in the premises, and may enforce the same by executing or in any way in which a court of equity may enforce its orders and decrees, including by imprisonment and fine for contempt. No property of such parents, except the homestead of either of them, shall be exempt from levy and sale under such execution or other process issued from the court.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), placement of a child in the custody of an agency of the state shall make the parents of that child liable for support from the effective date of the court's order. The court's placement of the child's custody with the state shall be deemed as an automatic application by the state, as custodian of the child, for child support services from the department of human services Title IV-D child support program.

In all cases in which the court places physical custody of any child with an agency of the state, and if no prior orders for the support of the child by each parent exist, the court shall immediately order child support or shall set a hearing, which hearing shall be held within forty-five (45) days of the date the child's custody is placed with the state, for the purpose of establishing child support and the provision of medical care, to be paid by each parent to the state for the child placed in the state's custody by the court. Such hearing may be set on the court's next regular child support docket within the forty-five-day period in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (b)(3).

The parents and the Title IV-D office that is enforcing child support under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, compiled in 42 U.S.C. §§ 651 et seq., for the county from which the child is placed shall receive at least ten (10) calendar days' notice of the child support hearing date unless child support was ordered at the custody hearing.

The notice to the parents shall be in writing and may be given at the time of the hearing at which the child is placed in the custody of the state, and shall include a subpoena to each parent to bring to court any documents showing evidence of income, including, but not limited to, pay stubs, W-2 forms, or income tax returns. If not given to the parents at the hearing at which custody is placed with the state, the notice and subpoena shall be sent by mail to the parents or served upon them personally within five (5) working days of the date of the custody hearing, unless child support is ordered at the custody hearing.

Unless child support is ordered at the custody hearing, within five (5) working days of the date of the custody hearing at which the child is placed in the custody of the state, the clerk shall by mail, personal delivery, or by electronic means if the clerk participates in the statewide child support enforcement computer system pursuant to title 36, notify the office that is enforcing child support under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act for the county from which the child is placed of the date of the child support hearing, the names, addresses, and social security numbers of the parents and child. If support was ordered at the time of the custody hearing, the clerk shall notify the Title IV-D office of the amount of support that was ordered.

At any hearing at which support is ordered, the court shall set child support as the evidence demonstrates is appropriate and in accordance with the child support guidelines established pursuant to § 36-5-101(e), and the court shall order the parents to pay the premium for health insurance for the child if the insurance is available at a reasonable cost, or the court shall order the parents to pay a reasonable portion of the child's medical costs. The order for support and for medical care shall be retroactive to the date that custody of the child was placed with the state by any order of the court.

The court shall order the child support payments and any payments that are ordered by the court to be made by the parents to the state to offset the child's medical costs to be paid by the parents to the clerk, or to the department if the clerk is not participating in the statewide child support enforcement computer system pursuant to title 36. The court shall order the health insurance premiums ordered to be paid by the parents to be directed by them to the health insurance provider for the child or to be deducted from the parent's income as provided in § 36-5-501(a)(3).

When the court enters an order in which the paternity of a child is determined or support is ordered, enforced or modified for a child, each individual who is a party to any action pursuant to this part shall immediately file with the court and, if the case is a Title IV-D child support case, shall immediately file with the local Title IV-D child support office, for entry into the state registry of support cases, and shall update, as appropriate, the parties' and, for subdivisions (b)(4)(A)-(C), the child's or children's:

Full name and any change in name;

Social security number and date and place of birth;

Residential and mailing addresses;

Home telephone numbers;

Driver license number;

The name, address, and telephone number of the person's employer;

The availability and cost of health insurance for the child; and

Gross annual income.

The requirements of this subdivision (b)(4)(C) may be included in the court's order.

Each individual who is a party must update changes in circumstances of the individual for the information required by subdivision (b)(4)(C) within ten (10) days of the date of such change. At the time of the entry of the first order pertaining to child support after July 1, 1997, clear written notice shall be given to each party of the requirements of this subsection (b), procedures for complying with the subsection and a description of the effect or failure to comply. Such requirement may be noted in the order of the court.

In any subsequent child support enforcement action, the delivery of written notice as required by Rule 5 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure to the most recent residential or employer address shown in the court's records or the Title IV-D agency's records as required in subdivision (b)(4)(C) shall be deemed to satisfy due process requirements for notice and service of process with respect to that party if there is a sufficient showing and the court is satisfied that a diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location and whereabouts of the party.

Upon motion of either party, upon a showing of domestic violence or the threat of such violence, the court may enter an order to withhold from public access the address, telephone number, and location of the alleged victims(s) or threatened victims of such circumstances. The clerk of the court shall withhold such information based upon the court's specific order but may not be held liable for release of such information.

The provisions of § 36-5-501(a)(3) shall apply with respect to enrollment of a child in the noncustodial parent's employer-based health care plan.

The court shall order support paid by income assignment and by all other means provided for the support of children as may be necessary as provided in title 36, chapter 5, and the court may enforce its orders as provided in such chapter.

If any prior order for support exists for a child who is placed in the custody of the state in which the obligor was ordered to pay child support to the office of the clerk, the office that enforces child support pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act may certify to the clerk of that court in which the current order of support exists that the child for whom the support was ordered is in the custody of the state, and the clerk shall immediately, without further order of any court, forward all payments by the obligor to the department for distribution.

If the obligor is currently paying child support directly to the obligee under a support order that exists at the time the child is placed in the custody of the state, the court shall order the obligor to begin directing payments of support directly to the clerk of the juvenile court, or if the clerk is not participating in the statewide child support enforcement computer system pursuant to title 36, to the department.

When the child is no longer in the physical custody of the state, the Title IV-D office shall notify the clerk of the court to which it had sent the certification, or the department if the clerk is not participating in the statewide child support enforcement computer system, and shall notify the obligor. Until otherwise ordered by the court that had originally set the support or that currently has jurisdiction to set support, the child support shall thereafter be paid by the obligor to the person to whom the child support obligation was paid prior to the child's placement in the custody of the state.

Any child support funds remaining with the state after the child is returned to the physical custody of either parent or other custodian by court order shall be returned to the custodial parent or other custodian named in the order for use in the care of the child after reimbursement to the state of such costs incurred for the child's care by the state that are not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law or regulation.

In establishing or enforcing any provision of child support, if the party seeking to establish or to enforce an order of support specifically prays for revocation of a license, or if the court determines on its own motion or on motion of the party seeking to establish or seeking to enforce an order of support that an individual party has failed to comply with a subpoena or a warrant in connection with the establishment or enforcement of an order of support, the court may invoke the provisions of § 36-5-101(f)(5).

Judgments for child support payments for each child subject to the order for child support pursuant to this part shall be enforceable without limitation as to time.

In any case in which a child is receiving assistance under a state program funded under Title IV-A of the Social Security Act, compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., including, but not limited to, temporary assistance as provided under title 71, and the payment of support for such child is overdue, then, the department of human services may issue an administrative order to direct an individual who owes overdue support to such a child to pay the overdue support in accordance with a plan for payment of all overdue support or engage in work activities, as otherwise required and defined by the provisions of § 36-5-113.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 56; T.C.A., § 37-256; Acts 1995, ch. 504, § 8; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 1997, ch. 551, §§ 20, 24, 27, 47, 50, 67; 1998, ch. 1098, §§ 58, 59; 2001, ch. 447, §§ 11, 19.

Cross-References. Decree for support of children, §36-5-101.

Parents' powers and duties regarding support of minors, persons under and over 18 years of age, §34-1-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 15 Tenn. Juris., Injunctions, § 21.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Juvenile Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 447 (1977).

37-1-152. Injunctive relief.

At the commencement or during the pendency of any matter, or as part of its dispositional order, the court may, on application of a party or on its own motion, grant injunctive relief upon such terms as the court may deem proper.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 50; 1983, ch. 196, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 37-250; Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 39; 2016, ch. 600, § 12.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote this section which read: “(a) On application of a party, or on the court's own motion, the court may make an order restraining or otherwise controlling the conduct of a person if:“(1) An order of disposition of a delinquent, unruly or dependent or neglected child has been or is about to be made in a proceeding under this part, or if it appears that a person against whom the restraining order is sought should be prohibited from associating with or engaging in certain conduct in relation to such child either absolutely or conditionally;“(2) The court finds that the conduct:“(A) Is or may be detrimental or harmful to the child; and“(B) Will tend to defeat the execution of the order of disposition; and“(3) Due notice of the application or motion and the grounds therefor and an opportunity to be heard thereon have been given to the person against whom the order is directed.“(b) On application of a party or on the court's own motion, the court may issue an immediate ex parte temporary restraining order controlling the conduct of a person if:“(1) The court finds that a child otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the court may be removed from such jurisdiction or the court finds that there is danger of immediate harm to a child; and“(2) Due notice of the order and the grounds therefor and the opportunity to be heard thereon is given to the party against whom the order is directed within three (3) days of the issuance of such order or upon such party's application for a hearing.“(c) On application of the department or the child protection team as defined in part 6 of this chapter, the court may make a no contact order for the removal of a suspected perpetrator of child sexual abuse from the home where the child resides and from all further contact with the child, if the court finds that there is probable cause to believe that such person committed an act of child sexual abuse as defined in part 6 of this chapter. Such an order does not relieve such person from the person's legal duty to provide financial support for the person's family. The court may imprison any person violating such an order for up to one (1) year for contempt of court, or the court may fashion such other remedy as it finds appropriate for the protection of the child. If the court determines that there is an immediate threat of harm to the child, the court may issue a no contact order as provided in subsection (b); otherwise, it shall provide that due notice of the application and the grounds therefor and an opportunity to be heard thereon have been given to the person against whom the order is directed.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 17. July 1, 2016.

Cross-References. Child protective teams, §37-1-607.

Child sexual abuse defined, §37-1-602.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 26 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Juvenile Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 447 (1977).